src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_MAKS !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 80
+N:	NMN_MAKS	;
LEXICON N_MAKS-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 80
+N:     NMN_MAKS-PL   ;

LEXICON N_LUʼM !!≈ * __@CODE@__ luʼm:lum 81
+N:	NMN_LUʼM	;

LEXICON N_MIEʼR !!≈ * __@CODE@__ mieʼr:mier 82
+N:	NMN_MIEʼR	;

LEXICON N_MEʼR !!≈ * __@CODE@__ meʼr:mer 83
+N:	NMN_MEʼR	;

LEXICON N_MUʼR !!≈ * __@CODE@__ muʼr:mur 84
+N:	NMN_MUʼR	;

LEXICON N_KUOʼD !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kuoʼd:kuod aig 85
+N:        NMN_KUOʼD   ;

LEXICON N_SUʼŽ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ suʼž:suž 86
+N:	NMN_SUʼŽ	;

LEXICON N_KEʼŽ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ keʼž:kež aim 87
+N:        NMN_KEʼŽ   ;

LEXICON N_VEʼŽ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ veʼž:veʼž 88
+N:	NMN_VEʼŽ	;

LEXICON N_KUʼŽ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kuʼž:kuž 89
+N:	NMN_KUʼŽ	;

LEXICON N_RUZŪ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 90
+N:	NMN_RUZŪ	;

LEXICON N_RADIO !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 91
+N:	NMN_RADIO	;

LEXICON N_ANG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 92
+N:	NMN_ANG	;

LEXICON N_KOUV !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 93
+N:	NMN_KOUV	;

LEXICON N_KAND !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 94
!! kand:kand
	N_KAND-PL   ;
	N_KAND-SG   ;
LEXICON N_KAND-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 94
+N:	NMN_KAND-SG	;
LEXICON N_KAND-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 94
+N:	NMN_KAND-PL	;

LEXICON N_PȮRT !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 95
+N:	NMN_PȮRT	;

LEXICON N_NUŖM !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 96
+N:	NMN_NUŖM	;

LEXICON N_LAINT !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 97
+N:	NMN_LAINT	;

LEXICON N_LOUL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 98
+N:	NMN_LOUL	;

LEXICON N_UL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 99 ul:ul
+N:	NMN_UL	;

LEXICON N_PAN !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 100
+N:	NMN_PAN	;

LEXICON N_TÄM !!≈ * __@CODE@__ täm:tam 101 
 N_TÄM-SG    ;
 N_TÄM-PL    ;

LEXICON N_TÄM-SG
+N: NMN_TÄM-SG    ;
LEXICON N_TÄM-PL
+N: NMN_TÄM-PL    ;


LEXICON N_NIŖȚ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 102
+N:	NMN_NIŖȚ	;

LEXICON N_KUĻ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 103
+N:	NMN_KUĻ	;

LEXICON N_PAŅ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 104
+N:	NMN_PAŅ	;

LEXICON N_DAŅTŠ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 105
+N:	NMN_DAŅTŠ	;

LEXICON N_KOUŠ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 106
+N:	NMN_KOUŠ	;

LEXICON N_SPLEIŠ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 107
+N:	NMN_SPLEIŠ	;

LEXICON N_VEIS !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 108
+N:	NMN_VEIS	;

LEXICON N_PȮIS !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 109 pȯis:pȯis
!!≈ * Yaml: __N-pois__
 N_PȮIS-SG ;
 N_PȮIS-PL ;
LEXICON N_PȮIS-SG
+N:	NMN_PȮIS-SG	;
LEXICON N_PȮIS-PL
+N:	NMN_PȮIS-PL	;

LEXICON N_KIĻG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 110
+N:	NMN_KIĻG	;

LEXICON N_VȮĻG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 111
+N:	NMN_VȮĻG	;

LEXICON N_TÄUŽ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ täuž:täud adres 112
!! N_SgGen/d-Nom/ž-Par//ta
!! __täuž:täud__
	N_TÄUŽ-SG	;
	N_TÄUŽ-PL	;
LEXICON N_TÄUŽ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 116
+N:	NMN_TÄUŽ-SG	;
LEXICON N_TÄUŽ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 116
+N:	NMN_TÄUŽ-PL	;


LEXICON N_VAŖŽ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 113
+N:	NMN_VAŖŽ	;

LEXICON N_PIERZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 114
+N:	NMN_PIERZ	;

LEXICON N_VÕRGÕ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 115
+N:	NMN_VÕRGÕ	;

LEXICON N_JÕUGÕ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 116
!! N_SgPar/VowsLI1/ța-PlPar/VowsRM/idi
!! __jõugõ:jõugõ__
	N_JÕUGÕ-SG	;
	N_JÕUGÕ-PL	;
LEXICON N_JÕUGÕ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 116
+N:	NMN_JÕUGÕ-SG	;
LEXICON N_JÕUGÕ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 116
+N:	NMN_JÕUGÕ-PL	;

LEXICON N_VȬIDAG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 117
+N:	NMN_VȬIDAG	;

LEXICON N_SIELDÕ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 118
+N:	NMN_SIELDÕ	;
LEXICON N_SIELDÕ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 118
+N:     NMN_SIELDÕ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_NǬʼGÕ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ nǭʼgõ:nǭgõ 119
+N:	NMN_NǬʼGÕ	;
LEXICON N_NǬʼGÕ-PL	!!≈ * __@CODE@__ nǭʼgõ:nǭgõ 119
+N:     NMN_NǬʼGÕ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_AŠŠÕ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 120
 N_AŠŠÕ-SG ;
 N_AŠŠÕ-PL ;
LEXICON N_AŠŠÕ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 120
+N:	NMN_AŠŠÕ-SG	;
LEXICON N_AŠŠÕ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 120
+N:     NMN_AŠŠÕ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_DRŪʼOŠÕ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ drūʼošõ:drūošõ 121
+N:	NMN_DRŪʼOŠÕ	;

LEXICON N_SOʼV !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 122
+N:	NMN_SOʼV	;
LEXICON N_SOʼV-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 122
+N:     NMN_SOʼV-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KǬJ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 123
+N:	NMN_KǬJ	;
LEXICON N_KǬJ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 123
+N:     NMN_KǬJ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ǬʼJ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ǭʼj:ǭj 124
+N:	NMN_ǬʼJ	;

LEXICON N_IRM !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 125
+N:	NMN_IRM	  ;
LEXICON N_IRM-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 125
+N:     NMN_IRM-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KIM !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 126
+N:	NMN_KIM	;
LEXICON N_KIM-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 126
+N:     NMN_KIM-SG   ;
LEXICON N_KIM-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 126
+N:     NMN_KIM-PL   ;

LEXICON N_VȮŅ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 127
+N:	NMN_VȮŅ	;

LEXICON N_VAʼIT !!≈ * __@CODE@__ vaʼit:vait 128
+N:	NMN_VAʼIT	;

LEXICON N_VAʼIT-PL	!!≈ * __@CODE@__ vaʼit:vait 128
+N:     NMN_VAʼIT-PL   ;

LEXICON N_AMĀT !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 129
+N:	NMN_AMĀT	;

LEXICON N_AMĀT-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 129
+N:     NMN_AMĀT-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KULTŪR !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 130
+N:	NMN_AMĀT	;

LEXICON N_SAʼGDIT !!≈ * __@CODE@__ saʼgdit:sagdit 131
+N:	NMN_AMĀT	;

LEXICON N_VIĻȚ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 132
+N:	NMN_VIĻȚ	;
LEXICON N_VIĻȚ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 132
+N:     NMN_VIĻȚ-PL   ;


LEXICON N_EĻ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 133
+N:	NMN_EĻ	;

LEXICON N_BLĒʼḐ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ blēʼḑ:blēʼḑ 134
	N_BLĒʼḐ-SG	;
	N_BLĒʼḐ-PL	;

LEXICON N_BLĒʼḐ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ blēʼḑ:blēʼḑ 134
+N:	NMN_BLĒʼḐ-SG	;
LEXICON N_BLĒʼḐ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ blēʼḑ:blēʼḑ 134
+N:	NMN_BLĒʼḐ-PL	;

LEXICON N_FAKT !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 135
+N:	NMN_FAKT	;
LEXICON N_FAKT-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 135
+N:     NMN_FAKT-PL   ;

LEXICON N_TAS !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 136
+N:	NMN_TAS	;

LEXICON N_NEITST !!≈ * __@CODE@__ neitst:neits 137
+N:	NMN_NEITST	;

LEXICON N_SĪEND !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 138
+N:	NMN_SĪEND	;

LEXICON N_LǞʼND !!≈ * __@CODE@__ lǟʼnd:lǟnd 139
+N:	NMN_LǞʼND	;

LEXICON N_ĀIGAST !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 140
+N:	NMN_ĀIGAST   ;
LEXICON N_ĀIGAST-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 140
+N:	NMN_ĀIGAST-PL	;

LEXICON N_ANALĪZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 141
+N: 	NMN_ANALĪZ ;

LEXICON N_NĪʼEM !!≈ * __@CODE@__ nīʼem:nīem 142
+N: 	NMN_NĪʼEM ;

LEXICON N_JAĻKŠ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 143
+N:	NMN_JAĻKŠ	;

LEXICON N_JAĻKŠ-PL	!!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 143
+N:     NMN_JAĻKŠ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_VIŠ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 144 viš:viš
	N_VIŠ-SG	;
	N_VIŠ-PL	;
LEXICON N_VIŠ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 144
+N:	NMN_VIŠ-SG	;
LEXICON N_VIŠ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 144
+N:	NMN_VIŠ-PL	;

LEXICON N_RŪʼTŠ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ rūʼtš:rūtš 145
+N:	NMN_RŪʼTŠ	;

LEXICON N_RŪʼTŠ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ rūʼtš:rūtš 145
+N:     NMN_RŪʼTŠ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_TĒʼḐ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tēʼḑ:tēḑ 146
+N:	NMN_TĒʼḐ	;

LEXICON N_LĒʼḐ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ lēʼḑ:lēḑ 147
+N:	NMN_LĒʼḐ	;
LEXICON N_LĒʼḐ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ lēʼḑ:lēḑ 147
+N:     NMN_LĒʼḐ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KĪNTŠ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 148
+N:	NMN_KĪNTŠ	;

LEXICON N_KǬŅTŠ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 149
+N:	NMN_KǬŅTŠ	;

LEXICON N_LĒŅTŠ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 150
+N:	NMN_LĒŅTŠ	;

LEXICON N_LĪEM !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 151
+N:	NMN_LĪEM	;

LEXICON N_AʼM !!≈ * __@CODE@__ aʼm:am 152
+N:	NMN_AʼM	;

LEXICON N_AZŪM !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 153 azūm:aʼzūm
	N_AZŪM-SG	;
	N_AZŪM-PL	;
LEXICON N_AZŪM-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 153
+N:     NMN_AZŪM-SG   ;
LEXICON N_AZŪM-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 153
+N:     NMN_AZŪM-PL   ;

LEXICON N_VÕȚĪM !!≈ * __@CODE@__ võțīm:võțīm 154 
	N_VÕȚĪM-SG	;
	N_VÕȚĪM-PL	;
LEXICON N_VÕȚĪM-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 154
+N: 	NMN_VÕȚĪM-SG ;
LEXICON N_VÕȚĪM-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 154
+N:	NMN_VÕȚĪM-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KǬŅIM !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 155
	N_KǬŅIM-SG	;
	N_KǬŅIM-PL	;
LEXICON N_KǬŅIM-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 155
+N:	NMN_KǬŅIM-SG   ;
LEXICON N_KǬŅIM-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 155
+N:     NMN_KǬŅIM-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ĒTAM !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 156
	N_ĒTAM-SG	;
	N_ĒTAM-PL	;
LEXICON N_ĒTAM-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 156
+N:	NMN_ĒTAM-SG   ;
LEXICON N_ĒTAM-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 156
+N:     NMN_ĒTAM-PL   ;

LEXICON N_SIDĀM !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 157
+N:	NMN_SIDĀM	;
LEXICON N_SIDĀM-PL	!!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 157
+N:     NMN_SIDĀM-PL   ;

LEXICON N_TŪOITÕG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 158
+N:	NMN_TŪOITÕG	;

LEXICON N_KǬRAND !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 159
!! * Yaml: __armtõb__
	N_KǬRAND-SG	;
	N_KǬRAND-PL	;
LEXICON N_KǬRAND-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 159
+N:	NMN_KǬRAND-SG	;
LEXICON N_KǬRAND-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 159
+N:     NMN_KǬRAND-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ȬʼDÕG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ȭʼdõg:ȭdõg 160
+N:	NMN_ȬʼDÕG	;

LEXICON N_TAPTÕD !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 161
+N:	NMN_TAPTÕD	;

LEXICON N_TĪʼEDÕD !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tīʼedõd:tīedõd 162
+N:	NMN_TĪʼEDÕD	;

LEXICON N-VĪDÕZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 163
+N:	NMN_VĪDÕZ	;

LEXICON N_TUOISTÕNZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 164
+N:	NMN_TUOISTÕNZ	;
