src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
bril:bril N_KIM-SG  "silmälasit" ;
bēʼrõd:bēʼr N_VAʼIT-PL  "hautajaistilaisuus" ;
dillõd:dil N_KIM-PL  "tilli" ;
fekālõd:fekāl N_AMĀT-PL  "ulosteet" ;
jetmõd:jetīm N_VÕȚĪM-PL  "jäännökset" ;
jõugõ:jõugõ N_JÕUGÕ  "hiekka" ;
jõugõd:jõug N_JÕUGÕ-PL  "YY" ;
jǭņõd:jǭņ N_VIĻȚ-PL  "juhannus" ;
kiļg:kiļg N_KIĻG  "kylki" ;
knips:knips N_MAKS  "näpsäys" ;
kopij:kopij N_KǬJ  "kopio" ;
kouv:kouv N_KOUV  "kaivo" ;
kuoʼd:kuoʼd N_KUOʼD  "koti" ;
kuʼž:kuʼž N_KUʼŽ  "kusi" ;
kõʼurõkeʼž:kõʼurõ#keʼž N_KEʼŽ  "lahjus" ;
kǭņim:kǭņim N_KǬŅIM  "sanka" ;
lejākīntš:lejā#kīntš N_KĪNTŠ  "hevosen kavio" ;
luʼm:luʼm N_LUʼM  "lumi" ;
lēņtš:lēņtš N_LĒŅTŠ  "lounas" ;
lēʼtšõd:lēʼtš N_RŪʼTŠ-PL  "YY" ;
meʼr:meʼr N_MEʼR  "meri" ;
mǭškõdzapt:mǭškõd#zapt N_MAKS  "mansikkahillo" ;
noʼugõd:noʼugõ N_NǬʼGÕ-PL  "noki" ;
num:num N_UL  "kangas" ;
nǭʼvõ:nǭʼvõ N_NǬʼGÕ  "kuolema" ;
oustõrveis:oustõr#veis N_VEIS  "osteriveitsi" ;
oʼvd:oʼvd N_SOʼV-PL  "havupuun oksat" ;
pan:pan N_PAN  "pannu" ;
papārd:papār N_SIDĀM-PL  "sananjalka" ;
pierz:pierz N_PIERZ  "perse" ;
piškizvieʼr:piškiz#vieʼr N_MIEʼR  "vähäverisyys" ;
piʼvtäuž:piʼv#täud N_TÄUŽ  "kourallinen" ;
piʼļgõm:piʼļgõm N_ȬʼDÕG  "maili" ;
plēšõd:plēš N_JAĻKŠ-PL  "palkeet" ;
plūmõdlīem:plūmõd#līem N_LĪEM  "luumumehu" ;
predikāt:predikāt N_AMĀT  "predikaatti" ;
prorektōr:prorektōr N_SIDĀM  "vararehtori" ;
puņtš:puņtš N_DAŅTŠ  "mutru" ;
pēgalpȯis:pēgal#pȯis N_PȮIS  "peukaloinen" ;
pǟnouk:pǟn#ouk N_LOUL  "kaula-aukko" ;
pǟvǭŗ:pǟ#vǭŗ N_VIĻȚ  "katto pään päällä" ;
pȯrt:pȯrt N_PȮRT  "huora" ;
pȯʼj:pȯʼj N_SOʼV  "povi" ;
radio:radio N_RADIO  "radio" ;
restūd:rest N_MAKS-PL  "säleikkö" ;
rokkouš:rok#kouš N_KOUŠ  "keittokulho" ;
rokpaņ:rok#paņ N_PAŅ  "hapatetun jauhojuoman astia" ;
rēkõm:rēkõm N_KǬRAND  "laskelma" ;
rīʼest:rīʼest N_NĪʼEM  "into" ;
rīʼjǭʼj:rīʼj#ǭʼj N_ǬʼJ  "riihiuuni" ;
rīʼvȯŗž:rīʼ#vȯŗž N_VAŖŽ  "parsi" ;
rūožpȭzõ:rūož#pȭzõ N_SIELDÕ  "ruusupensas" ;
rūʼtš:rūʼtš N_RŪʼTŠ  "motkottaja" ;
rǭresursõd:rǭ#resurs N_ĀIGAST-PL  "rahavarat" ;
sekretariāt:sekretariāt N_ANALĪZ  "sihteeristö" ;
siʼdtaņgõd:siʼd#taņg N_FAKT-PL  "hiilipihdit" ;
spleiš:spleiš N_SPLEIŠ  "pujos" ;
spēršk:spēršk N_FAKT  "värssy" ;
strǭiptõd:strǭiptõd N_TAPTÕD  "tuomittu" ;
studijõd:studij N_KǬJ-PL  "opinnot" ;
stuņḑ:stuņḑ N_NIŖȚ  "tunti" ;
supīn:supīn N_KULTŪR  "supiini" ;
sõʼbritsiʼdmõd:sõʼbrit#siʼdūm N_AZŪM-PL  "ystävyyssiteet" ;
sīpõltāimõd:sīpõl#tāim N_KAND-PL  "sipulikasvit" ;
tabārtīb:tabār#tīb N_IRM  "pyrstöevä" ;
tagākǭņtš:tagā#kǭņtš N_KǬŅTŠ  "takakansi" ;
tigīm:tiʼgīm N_AZŪM  "aivot" ;
toļ:toļ N_KUĻ  "hanka" ;
tsepītpan:tsepīt#pan N_PAN  "paistinpannu" ;
tsitrōnvȭidag:tsitrōn#vȭidag N_VȬIDAG  "sitruunavoi" ;
tubāneitst:tubā#neits N_NEITST  "sisäkkö" ;
tuoistõnd:tuoistõnd N_TUOISTÕNZ  "YY" ;
tuʼlsiʼž:tuʼl#siʼž N_SUʼŽ  "hehkuva hiili" ;
tējtas:tēj#tas N_TAS  "teekuppi" ;
tīekūož:tīe#kūož N_JAĻKŠ  "työpaikka" ;
tšiļtšaļ:tšiļ#tšaļ N_EĻ  "peukaloinen" ;
tūʼgõtuš:tūʼgõ#tuš N_VIŠ  "maamuna" ;
tūʼr:tūʼr N_VAʼIT  "nurkka" ;
tǭlavīļanuŗm:tǭla#vīļa#nuŗm N_NUŖM  "syysviljapelto" ;
ulzeitmõd:ulz#ētam N_ĒTAM-PL  "uloste" ;
van:van N_KIM  "amme" ;
vang:vang N_ANG  "luhta" ;
vanālaint:vanā#laint N_LAINT  "maininki" ;
vanāmieʼr:vanā#mieʼr N_MIEʼR  "muinaismeri" ;
vetō:vetō N_RUZŪ  "veto" ;
veʼr:veʼr N_MEʼR  "veri" ;
veʼž:veʼd N_VEʼŽ  "vesi" ;
viltsīņtõblīʼedõd:viltsīņtõb#līʼed N_LĒʼḐ-PL  "sapilaat" ;
vingkard:ving#kard N_KAND  "hään haju" ;
võțīm:võțīm N_VÕȚĪM  "avain" ;
vīkõd:vīk N_IRM-PL  "virnat" ;
vȯļg:vȯļg N_VȮĻG  "olki" ;
vȯʼl:vȯʼl N_AʼM  "olut" ;
äʼbvȯņ:äʼb#vȯņ N_VȮŅ  "epäonni" ;
āinalēʼḑ:āina#lēʼḑ N_LĒʼḐ  "ruohonlehti" ;
ēbrikšvõrgõ:ēbrikš#võrgõ N_VÕRGÕ  "hämähäkinseitti" ;
ēdrõmõd:ēdrõm N_KǬRAND-PL  "kuukautiset" ;
ētam:ētam N_ĒTAM  "heitto" ;
īekšõd:īekšõ N_AŠŠÕ-PL  "sisälmykset" ;
īʼtit:īʼtit N_SAʼGDIT  "samankaltaisuus" ;
škēʼļ:škēʼļ N_BLĒʼḐ  "viipale" ;
štokīzõr:štokīzõr N_TŪOITÕG  "harkkorauta" ;
ūsõd:ūsõ N_SIELDÕ-PL  "viikset" ;
ūʼoļmõaʼr:ūʼoļmõ#aʼr N_MUʼR  "ohjat" ;
mieʼrtēʼḑ:mieʼr#tēʼḑ N_TĒʼḐ  "meritähti" ;
rubīžkonflikt:rubīž#konflikt N_ĀIGAST  "rajaselkkaus" ;
korktäm:kork#tam N_TÄM  "korkkitammi" ;
